Maryland, session 2025, HB0433.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–901.1.
(a) A person is guilty of reckless driving if [he] THE PERSON drives a motor
vehicle:
(1) In wanton or willful disregard for the safety of persons or property; or
(2) In a manner that indicates a wanton or willful disregard for the safety
of persons or property.
(b) A person is guilty of negligent driving if he drives a motor vehicle in a careless
or imprudent manner that endangers any property or the life or person of any individual.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0433*

HOUSE BILL 433
(c) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) of this section is GUILTY OF
A MISDEMEANOR AND IS subject to [a]:
(1) A fine not exceeding $1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 30
DAYS OR BOTH; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN
3 YEARS AFTER A PRIOR CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR BOTH.
21–901.2.
(A) A person is guilty of aggressive driving if the person commits three or more of
the following offenses at the same time or during a single and continuous period of driving
in violation of:
(1) § 21–202 of this title (Traffic lights with steady indication);
(2) § 21–303 of this title (Overtaking and passing vehicles);
(3) § 21–304 of this title (Passing on right);
(4) § 21–309 of this title (Driving on laned roadways);
(5) § 21–310 of this title (Following too closely);
(6) § 21–403 of this title (Failure to yield right–of–way); or
(7) § 21–801.1 of this title (Exceeding a maximum speed limit or posted
maximum speed limit).
(B) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND IS SUBJECT TO:
(1) A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 30 DAYS OR BOTH; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING WITHIN
3 YEARS AFTER A PRIOR CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING
$1,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 90 DAYS OR BOTH.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.